North Dakota, session 69, HB1522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 40-05-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
40-05-22. Golf carts on city streets.
The governing body of a city may allow by an ordinance the operation of golf carts on the city
streets. The ordinance may not allow a golf cart on federal, state, or county highways in the city, except
for the perpendicular crossing of these highways. The ordinance may not allow the operation of a golf
cart on city streets except for daytime travel between the owner's place of residence and a golf courseat
night. Golf carts that are allowed to operate on the city streets as the result of an ordinance are exempt
from the title, registration, and equipment provisions of title 39.

H. B. NO. 1522 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1522.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 7 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 4 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State